Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.245.040

Expanded access—Targeted populations—Evaluation.

Subject to available funding, skill centers shall provide access to late afternoon and evening sessions and summer school programs, to rural and high-density area students aligned with regionally identified high-demand occupations. When possible, the programs shall be specifically targeted for credit retrieval, dropout prevention and intervention for at-risk students, and retrieval of dropouts. Skill centers that receive funding for these activities must participate in an evaluation that is designed to quantify results and identify best practices, collaborate with local community partners in providing a comprehensive program, and provide matching funds.

[ 2007 c 463 s 5.]